Florida, session 2026, HB155.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 394.4997, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
394.4997 Gun Violence Prevention Pilot Program.—
(1) LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.—The Legislature finds
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb155-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 155 2026
that persons under 21 years of age in this state are
disproportionately affected by gun violence, which has
significant adverse effects on the health, safety, and well-
being of persons under 21 years of age. Further, the Legislature
finds that mental health challenges and unresolved conflicts are
contributing factors to the prevalence of gun violence and that
there is a need for targeted mental health and conflict
resolution education programs to assist persons under 21 years
of age in mitigating these issues. It is the intent of the
Legislature to establish programs that provide mental health
services tailored to the needs of persons under 21 years of age,
implement conflict resolution training in schools and community
centers to prevent violence, and fund community-based
initiatives that address the root causes of gun violence among
persons under 21 years of age.
(2) CREATION.—
(a) IMPACT GNV of the City of Gainesville shall develop
and implement a Gun Violence Prevention Pilot Program in the
City of Gainesville, in collaboration with the Department of
Juvenile Justice, the state attorney, and the public defender of
the eighth judicial circuit.
(b) The Gun Violence Prevention Pilot Program shall
provide mental health services, community-based intervention
programs, conflict resolution training, and alternative
opportunities.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb155-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 155 2026
(c) IMPACT GNV shall design the pilot program to align
with and complement existing efforts in the City of Gainesville
to address gun violence among youth and young adults. IMPACT GNV
shall, at a minimum, consult with stakeholders before and during
implementation of the pilot program.
(3) ELIGIBILITY.—In order to become an eligible program
participant, he or she must be:
(a) A person who is at least 10 to 21 years of age, who is
at moderate or high risk of being:
1. A victim of gun violence;
2. An offender who has inflicted bodily harm or death; or
3. An individual returning to the community from a
delinquency residential program.
(b) A family member of a person eligible under paragraph
(a).
(4) PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS.—The program shall:
(a) Provide program participants with access to mental
health services, including, but not limited to, all of the
following:
1. Individual therapy sessions with qualified
professionals or mental health counselors to address personal
mental health issues.
2. Facilitated group therapy sessions to provide peer
support and shared experiences.
3. Family therapy sessions involving family members to
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb155-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 155 2026
address familial issues contributing to mental health problems.
4. Trauma-focused cognitive behavioral therapy for
participants who have experienced trauma.
5. Art and music therapies to help participants express
emotions and cope with stress.
6. Substance abuse treatment programs addressing substance
abuse issues that may contribute to violent behavior.
7. Mediation training.
8. Restoration of relationships.
9. Resilience and leadership skills.
(b) In collaboration with the Department of Juvenile
Justice, the state attorney, and the public defender for the
eighth judicial circuit, provide program participants who are
involved with the delinquency system or on probation with
opportunities to obtain:
1. A graduate equivalency degree.
2. Job training, skills development, or an apprenticeship.
3. Employment at high-risk or critical need positions.
(5) REFERRAL.—
(a) The public defender's office will receive referrals to
the dependency program.
(b) The state attorney's office will receive referrals to
the diversion program under part III of chapter 985.
(c) The Department of Juvenile Justice will receive
100 referrals to the class for firearm offenders under s.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb155-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 155 2026
101 985.601(11).
102 (6) REPORTS.-
103 (a) Beginning October 31, 2027, and annually thereafter,
104 the City of Gainesville, in collaboration with Alachua County,
105 shall report to IMPACT GNV and the Department of Juvenile
106 Justice the number of participants in the pilot program; data on
107 the impact on the rate of gun violence among individuals within
108 the age group and geographic area served by the program; data on
109 risk factors for gun violence in the geographic area served by
110 the program; feedback from program participants; and
111 recommendations for improvement and expansion of services based
112 on the results of the pilot program.
113 (b) IMPACT GNV shall report to the Governor, the Speaker
114 of the House of Representatives, and the President of the Senate
115 by December 31 of each year on the implementation and
116 performance of the program.
117 (7) REPEAL.—This section will expire on June 30, 2030.
118 Section 2. For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of
119 $500,000 is appropriated in nonrecurring funds from the General
120 Revenue Fund to the Department of Children and Families for the
121 purpose of implementing this act.
122 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb155-00